Utah statutes.
73-18-13.3.   Accident involving death -- Stop at accident -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "reason to believe" means information from which a reasonable person would believe that the person may have been involved in an accident.

(2) (a)  The operator of a vessel who has reason to believe that the operator may have been involved in an accident resulting in the death of a person shall:

(i)  immediately stop the vessel at the scene of the accident or as close to it as safely possible; and

(ii)  remain at the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(b)  If the operator of a vessel has reason to believe the operator may have been involved in an accident only after leaving the scene of the accident, the operator shall immediately comply as nearly as possible with the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(3)  A person who violates the provisions of Subsection (2) is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be fined not less than $750.

